Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-554
Application, defined.

Application means a computer program that provides a specific service to the user. Application includes the applications specified in Laws 1989, LB 814, section 54, and all applications of statewide or intergovernmental benefit subject to the review set forth in subdivision (2)(a) of section 86-563.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 324.